Utah statutes.
20A-3-409 (Superseded 01/01/12).   Disposition of ballot by county clerk.

(1)  Upon receipt by the county clerk of the envelope containing the ballot, the county clerk shall:

(a)  enclose the unopened envelope containing the ballot and the written application of the military or overseas citizen voter in a larger envelope;

(b)  securely seal and endorse it with:

(i)  the name or number of the proper voting precinct;

(ii)  the name and official title of the clerk;

(iii)  the words: "This envelope contains an absentee voter's official Utah election ballot to be voted at ____ (Insert Name and Number) precinct, in ____ (Insert Name) county, and may be opened on election day at the polls while the polls are open."; and

(c)  safely keep the envelope in his office until it is delivered by him to the proper election judges.

(2) (a)  When reasonably possible, the county clerk shall deliver or mail all military or overseas citizen voter ballot envelopes to the appropriate voting precinct election judges so that they may be processed on election day.

(b)  If the clerk is unable to determine the voting precinct to which the ballot should be sent or when valid ballots are received too late to deliver to the election judges on election day, the clerk shall keep them in a safe place until delivery can be made as required by Section  20A-3-309.

